en: SIM Cards
xx: SIM Cards
cs: Karty SIM
da: SIM-kort
de: SIM-Karten
es: Tarjetas SIM
fr: Cartes SIM
it: Schede SIM
ja: SIMカード
nl: Simkaarten
no: SIM-kort
pl: Karty SIM
pt: Chips
ru: SIM-карты
sv: Kontantkort och SIM-kort till mobiltelefoner
tr: SIM Kartlar

en: Mobile Phone Replacement Parts
xx: Mobile Phone Replacement Parts
cs: Náhradní díly pro mobilní telefony
da: Reservedele til mobiltelefoner
de: Ersatzteile für Mobiltelefone
es: Piezas de repuesto para teléfonos móviles
fr: Pièces de rechange pour téléphones mobiles
it: Parti di ricambio per telefoni cellulari
ja: 携帯電話・スマートフォン用交換パーツ
nl: Vervangende onderdelen voor mobiele telefoons
no: Reservedeler til mobiltelefoner
pl: Części zamienne do telefonów komórkowych
pt: Peças de substituição para aparelhos celulares
ru: Запасные части для мобильных телефонов
sv: Reservdelar för mobiltelefoner
tr: Cep Telefonu Yedek Parçaları

en: Mobile Phone Stands
xx: Mobile Phone Stands
cs: Držáky na mobilní telefony
da: Mobiltelefon – holdere
de: Mobiltelefonhalterungen & -ständer
es: Soportes de teléfonos móviles para coches
fr: Supports pour téléphones mobiles
it: Supporti da auto per cellulari
ja: 携帯電話・スマートフォン用スタンド
nl: Carkits voor mobiele telefoons
no: Mobiltelefonholdere
pl: Podstawki pod telefony komórkowe
pt: Suportes de celular para carros
ru: Стойки и держатели для мобильных телефонов
sv: Mobiltelefonställ
tr: Cep Telefonu Stantları

en: SIM Card Ejection Tools
xx: SIM Card Ejection Tools
cs: Nástroje pro vytažení SIM karet
da: Værktøjer til udtagning af SIM-kort
de: Auswurfhilfen für SIM-Karten
es: Herramientas para extraer tarjetas SIM
fr: Outils d'éjection de carte SIM
it: Strumenti per l'espulsione di schede SIM
ja: SIMカード用取り出しツール
nl: SIM-uitwerpgereedschap
no: Utmatingsverktøy for SIM-kort
pl: Przyrządy do wyjmowania karty SIM
pt: Ferramentas de ejeção de cartão SIM
ru: Инструменты для извлечения SIM-карт
sv: Utmatningsverktyg för SIM-kort
tr: SIM Kart Çıkarma Aletleri

en: Basic phone
fr: Téléphone basique

en: Mobile Phones, mobile phones, cell phones
xx: Mobile Phones
cs: Mobilní telefony
da: Mobiltelefoner
de: Mobiltelefone, Handys
es: Teléfonos móviles, teléfonos móviles, celulares
fr: Téléphones mobiles, téléphones portables, téléphones mobiles, Téléphone mobile
it: Telefoni cellulari
ja: 携帯電話・スマートフォン
nl: Mobiele telefoons
no: Mobiltelefoner
pl: Telefony komórkowe
pt: Celulares
ru: Мобильные телефоны
sv: Mobiltelefoner
tr: Cep Telefonları

en: Smartphones
xx: Smartphones, Smartphone

en: Android smartphones
fr: Smartphones Android

en: iPhone smartphones
xx: iPhone, iPhones
fr: Smartphones iPhone

en: Contract Mobile Phones
xx: Contract Mobile Phones
cs: Mobilní telefony s tarifem
da: Mobiltelefoner med abonnement
de: Mobiltelefone mit Vertrag
es: Teléfonos móviles de contrato
fr: Téléphones portables sous contrat
it: Telefoni cellulari in abbonamento
ja: 契約携帯電話・スマートフォン
nl: Mobiele telefoons met abonnement
no: Mobiltelefoner med abonnement
pl: Telefony komórkowe na abonament
pt: Celulares com plano mensal
ru: Мобильные телефоны с контрактом
sv: Mobiltelefoner med abonnemang
tr: Faturalı Cep Telefonları

en: Pre-paid Mobile Phones
xx: Pre-paid Mobile Phones
cs: Předplacené mobilní telefony
da: Mobiltelefoner med taletidskort
de: Prepaid-Mobiltelefone
es: Teléfonos móviles de prepago
fr: Téléphones portables prépayés
it: Telefoni cellulari prepagati
ja: プリペイド式携帯電話・スマートフォン
nl: Prepaid mobiele telefoons
no: Mobiltelefoner med kontantkort
pl: Telefony komórkowe na kartę
pt: Celulares pré-pagos
ru: Мобильные телефоны с предоплаченной связью
sv: Mobiltelefoner med kontantkort
tr: Faturasız Cep Telefonları

en: Unlocked Mobile Phones
xx: Unlocked Mobile Phones
cs: Odemčené mobilní telefony
da: Mobiltelefoner uden binding
de: Entsperrte Mobiltelefone
es: Teléfonos móviles libres
fr: Téléphones portables déverrouillés
it: Telefoni cellulari sbloccati
ja: ロック解除済み携帯電話・スマートフォン
nl: Simlockvrije telefoons
no: Mobiltelefoner uten operatørlås
pl: Telefony komórkowe bez blokady
pt: Celulares desbloqueados
ru: Разблокированные мобильные телефоны
sv: Olåsta mobiltelefoner
tr: Sözleşmesiz Cep Telefonları

en: Satellite Phones
xx: Satellite Phones
cs: Satelitní telefony
da: Satellittelefoner
de: Satellitentelefone
es: Teléfonos por satélite
fr: Téléphones satellites
it: Telefoni satellitari
ja: 衛星電話
nl: Satelliettelefoons
no: Satellittelefoner
pl: Telefony satelitarne
pt: Telefones via satélite
ru: Спутниковые телефоны
sv: Satellittelefoner
tr: Uydu Telefonları

en: Telephone Accessories
xx: Telephone Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k telefonům
da: Telefontilbehør
de: Telefonzubehör
es: Accesorios de telefonía
fr: Accessoires pour téléphones
it: Accessori per telefoni
ja: 電話関連用品
nl: Telefoonaccessoires
no: Telefontilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do telefonów
pt: Acessórios para telefone
ru: Принадлежности для телефонов
sv: Telefontillbehör
tr: Telefon Aksesuarları

en: Phone Cards
xx: Phone Cards
cs: Telefonní karty
da: Telefonkort
de: Telefonkarten
es: Tarjetas de teléfono
fr: Cartes téléphoniques
it: Schede telefoniche
ja: テレホンカード
nl: Telefoonkaarten
no: Telefonkort
pl: Karty telefoniczne
pt: Cartões telefônicos
ru: Телефонные карты
sv: Telefonsladdar
tr: Telefon Kartları

en: Video Conferencing
xx: Video Conferencing
cs: Videokonference
da: Videomøder
de: Videokonferenzsysteme
es: Videoconferencias
fr: Visioconférence
it: Videoconferenze
ja: ビデオ会議システム
nl: Videoconferenties
no: Videokonferanse
pl: Konferencje wideo
pt: Videoconferência
ru: Товары для видеоконференций
sv: Videokonferens
tr: Video Konferans Cihazları

en: Components
xx: Components
cs: Komponenty
da: Komponenter
de: Komponenten
es: Componentes
fr: Composants
it: Componenti
ja: 電子機器
nl: Componenten
no: Komponenter
pl: Elementy
pt: Componentes
ru: Электронные компоненты
sv: Komponenter
tr: Bileşenler

en: Accelerometers
xx: Accelerometers
cs: Akcelerometry
da: Accelerometre
de: Beschleunigungssensoren
es: Acelerómetros
fr: Accéléromètres
it: Accelerometri
ja: 加速度計
nl: Accelerometers
no: Akselerometere
pl: Akcelerometry
pt: Acelerômetros
ru: Акселерометры
sv: Accelerometrar
tr: İvme Ölçerler

en: Converters
xx: Converters
cs: Měniče a převodníky
da: Konvertere
de: Wandler
es: Convertidores
fr: Convertisseurs
it: Convertitori
ja: コンバータ
nl: Omvormers
no: Omformere
pl: Konwertery
pt: Conversores
ru: Преобразователи
sv: Konverterare
tr: Çeviriciler

en: Audio Converters
xx: Audio Converters
cs: Zvukové převodníky
da: Lydomformere
de: Audiowandler
es: Conversores de audio
fr: Convertisseurs audio
it: Convertitori audio
ja: オーディオ・コンバーター
nl: Audioconverters
no: Lydomformere
pl: Konwertery audio
pt: Conversores de áudio
ru: Аудиоконвертеры
sv: Ljudkonverterare
tr: Ses Çeviricileri